North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-52 Public Employees Retirement System
54-52-17.
Formulation of plan.

Participating members shall receive benefits according to this section and according to rules adopted by the board, not inconsistent with this chapter. No person is entitled to receive a prior service benefit if the person was not continuously employed by a governmental unit in North Dakota for a period of not less than two years immediately prior to eligibility for retirement.

Participating members shall receive credit for full-time employment or its equivalent from the date they attain eligibility until their normal retirement date, postponed retirement date, or early retirement date, as defined in this section. Part-time employment will be recognized as full-time employment on a prorated basis as the board may prescribe.

Retirement benefits are calculated from the participating member’s final average salary, which is the average of the highest salary received by the member for any thirty-six months employed during the last one hundred twenty months of employment. For members who terminate employment on or after August 1, 2010, final average salary is the average of the highest salary received by the member for any thirty-six months employed during the last one hundred eighty months of employment. For members who terminate employment between July 31, 2005, and August 1, 2010, final average salary is the average of the highest salary received by the member for any thirty-six months employed during the period for which the board has appropriate and accurate salary records on the board’s electronic database, but that period may not be more than the last one hundred eighty months of employment. For members who terminate employment after December 31, 2019, final average salary is the higher of the final average salary calculated on December 31, 2019, or the average salary earned in the three highest periods of twelve consecutive months employed during the last one hundred eighty months of employment. Months without earnings are excluded for the purpose of computing an average. If the participating member has worked for less than thirty-six months at the normal retirement date, the final average salary is the average salary for the total months of employment.

Retirement dates are defined as follows:

Normal retirement date, except for a national guard security officer or firefighter, a firefighter employed by a political subdivision, or a peace officer or correctional officer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation or by a political subdivision, is:

The first day of the month next following the month in which the member attains the age of sixty-five years; or

When the member has a combined total of years of service credit and years of age equal to eighty-five and has not received a retirement benefit under this chapter.

Normal retirement date for members first enrolled after December 31, 2015, except for a national guard security officer or firefighter, a firefighter employed by a political subdivision, a peace officer or correctional officer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation or by a political subdivision, or a supreme court or district court judge, is:

The first day of the month next following the month in which the member attains the age of sixty-five years; or

When the member has a combined total of years of service credit and years of age equal to ninety and the member attains a minimum age of sixty and has not received a retirement benefit under this chapter.

Normal retirement date for a national guard security officer or firefighter is:

The first day of the month next following the month in which the national guard security officer or firefighter attains the age of fifty-five years and has completed at least three eligible years of employment; or

When the national guard security officer or firefighter has a combined total of years of service credit and years of age equal to eighty-five and has not received a retirement benefit under this chapter.

Normal retirement date for a peace officer, firefighter, or correctional officer employed by a political subdivision is:

The first day of the month next following the month in which the peace officer, firefighter, or correctional officer attains the age of fifty-five years and has completed at least three eligible years of employment; or

When the peace officer, firefighter, or correctional officer has a combined total of years of service credit and years of age equal to eighty-five and has not received a retirement benefit under this chapter.

Normal retirement date for a peace officer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation is:

The first day of the month next following the month in which the peace officer attains the age of fifty-five years and has completed at least three eligible years of employment; or

When the peace officer has a combined total of years of service credit and years of age equal to eighty-five and has not received a retirement benefit under this chapter.

Postponed retirement date is the first day of the month next following the month in which the member, on or after July 1, 1977, actually severs or has severed the member’s employment after reaching the normal retirement date.

Early retirement date, except for a national guard security officer or firefighter, a firefighter employed by a political subdivision, or a peace officer or correctional officer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation or by a political subdivision, is the first day of the month next following the month in which the member attains the age of fifty-five years and has completed three years of eligible employment. For a national guard security officer or firefighter, early retirement date is the first day of the month next following the month in which the national guard security officer or firefighter attains the age of fifty years and has completed at least three years of eligible employment. For a firefighter employed by a political subdivision or a peace officer or correctional officer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation or by a political subdivision, early retirement date is the first day of the month next following the month in which the peace officer, firefighter, or correctional officer attains the age of fifty years and has completed at least three years of eligible employment.

Disability retirement date is the first day of the month after a member becomes permanently and totally disabled, according to medical evidence called for under the rules of the board, and has completed at least one hundred eighty days of eligible employment. For supreme and district court judges, permanent and total disability is based solely on a judge’s inability to perform judicial duties arising out of physical or mental impairment, as determined pursuant to rules adopted by the board or as provided by subdivision a of subsection 3 of section 27-23-03.

A member is eligible to receive disability retirement benefits only if the member became disabled during the period of eligible employment and applies for disability retirement benefits within twelve months of the date the member terminates employment.

A member is eligible to continue to receive disability benefits as long as the permanent and total disability continues and the member submits the necessary documentation and undergoes medical testing required by the board, or for as long as the member participates in a rehabilitation program required by the board, or both. If the board determines a member no longer meets the eligibility definition, the board may discontinue the disability retirement benefit. The board may pay the cost of any medical testing or rehabilitation services the board deems necessary and these payments are appropriated from the retirement fund for those purposes. A member’s receipt of disability benefits under this section is limited to receipt from the fund to which the member was actively contributing at the time the member became disabled.

The board shall calculate retirement benefits as follows:

Normal retirement benefits for all retirees, except supreme and district court judges, reaching normal retirement date equal an annual amount, payable monthly, comprised of a service benefit and a prior service benefit, as defined in this chapter, which is determined as follows:

For members first enrolled:

Before January 1, 2020, service benefit equals two percent of final average salary multiplied by the number of years of service employment.

After December 31, 2019, service benefit equals one and seventy-five hundredths percent of final average salary multiplied by the number of years of service employment.

Prior service benefit equals two percent of final average salary multiplied by the number of years of prior service employment.

Normal retirement benefits for all supreme and district court judges under the public employees retirement system reaching normal retirement date equal an annual amount, payable monthly, comprised of a benefit as defined in this chapter, determined as follows:

Benefits must be calculated from the time of appointment or election to the bench and must equal three and one-half percent of final average salary multiplied by the first ten years of judicial service, two and eighty hundredths percent of final average salary multiplied by the second ten years of judicial service, and one and one-fourth percent of final average salary multiplied by the number of years of judicial service exceeding twenty years.

Service benefits must include, in addition, an amount equal to the percent specified in subdivision a of final average salary multiplied by the number of years of nonjudicial employee service and employment.

Postponed retirement benefits are calculated as for single life benefits for those members who retired on or after July 1, 1977.

Early retirement benefits are calculated as for single life benefits accrued to the date of termination of employment, but must be actuarially reduced to account for benefit payments beginning before the normal retirement date, as determined under subsection 3. Except for a national guard security officer or firefighter, a firefighter employed by a political subdivision, a peace officer or correctional officer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation or by a political subdivision, or a supreme court or district court judge, early retirement benefits for members first enrolled after December 31, 2015, are calculated for single life benefits accrued to the date of termination of employment, but must be reduced by fixed rate of eight percent per year to account for benefit payments beginning before the normal retirement date. A retiree, other than a supreme or district court judge, is eligible for early retirement benefits only after having completed three years of eligible employment. A supreme or district court judge retiree is eligible for early retirement benefits only after having completed five years of eligible employment.

Except for supreme and district court judges, disability retirement benefits are twenty-five percent of the member’s final average salary. Disability retirement benefits for supreme and district court judges are seventy percent of final average salary reduced by the member’s primary social security benefits and by any workforce safety and insurance benefits paid. The minimum monthly disability retirement benefit under this section is one hundred dollars.

Upon termination of employment after completing three years of eligible employment, except for supreme and district court judges, who must complete five years of eligible employment, but before normal retirement date, a member who does not elect to receive early retirement benefits is eligible to receive deferred vested retirement benefits payable commencing on the member’s normal retirement date in one of the optional forms provided in subsection 9. Members who have delayed or inadvertently failed to apply for retirement benefits to commence on their normal retirement date may choose to receive either a lump sum payment equal to the amount of missed payments, or an actuarial increase to the form of benefit the member has selected, which increase must reflect the missed payments.

If before retiring a member dies after completing three years of eligible employment, except for supreme and district court judges, who must have completed five years of eligible employment, the board shall pay the member’s account balance to the member’s designated beneficiary as provided in this subsection. If the member has designated an alternate beneficiary with the surviving spouse’s written consent, the board shall pay the member’s account balance to the named beneficiary. If the member has named more than one primary beneficiary, the board shall pay the member’s account balance to the named primary beneficiaries in the percentages designated by the member or, if the member has not designated a percentage for the beneficiaries, in equal percentages. If one or more of the primary beneficiaries has predeceased the member, the board shall pay the predeceased beneficiary’s share to the remaining primary beneficiaries. If any beneficiary survives the member, yet dies before distribution of the beneficiary’s share, the beneficiary must be treated as if the beneficiary predeceased the member. If there are no remaining primary beneficiaries, the board shall pay the member’s account balance to the contingent beneficiaries in the same manner. If there are no remaining designated beneficiaries, the board shall pay the member’s account balance to the member’s estate. If the member has not designated an alternate beneficiary or the surviving spouse is the beneficiary, the surviving spouse of the member may select a form of payment as follows:

If the member was a supreme or district court judge, the surviving spouse may select one of the following optional forms of payment:

A lump sum payment of the member’s retirement account as of the date of death.

Payments as calculated for the deceased member as if the member was of normal retirement age at the date of death, payable until the spouse dies.

The surviving spouse of all other members may select one of the following options:

A lump sum payment of the member’s retirement account as of the date of death.

Payment of a monthly retirement benefit equal to fifty percent of the deceased member’s accrued single life retirement benefits until the spouse dies.

If the member dies on or after the member’s normal retirement date, the payment of a monthly retirement benefit equal to an amount that would have been paid to the surviving spouse if the member had retired on the day of the member’s death and had selected a one hundred percent joint and survivor annuity, payable until the spouse dies. A surviving spouse who received a benefit under this subsection as of July 31, 1995, is entitled to the higher of that person’s existing benefit or the equivalent of the accrued benefit available under the one hundred percent joint and survivor provision as if the deceased member were of normal retirement age, with the increase payable beginning August 1, 1995.

If a member not coming under the provisions of subsection 6 terminates employment because of death, permanent and total disability, or any voluntary or involuntary reason prior to retirement, the member or the member’s designated beneficiary is entitled to the member’s account balance at termination. The board automatically shall refund a member’s account balance if the member has completed less than three years of eligible employment, has an account balance of less than one thousand dollars, and was not a supreme or district court judge. If the member was a supreme or district court judge, the board automatically shall refund a member’s account balance if the member completed less than five years of eligible employment. A member may waive the refund if the member submits a written statement to the board, within thirty days after termination, requesting that the member’s account balance remain in the fund.

The surviving spouse of a member receiving retirement benefits must be the member’s primary beneficiary unless there is no surviving spouse or the surviving spouse designates an alternate beneficiary in writing. If a member receiving retirement benefits or the member’s surviving spouse receiving retirement benefits dies before the total amount of benefits paid to either or both equals the amount of the member’s account balance at retirement, the difference must be paid to the named beneficiary of the recipient or, if there is no named beneficiary, to the recipient’s estate. A benefit payment owed to the member, surviving spouse, or alternate beneficiary which was not paid before the death of the member, surviving spouse, or alternate beneficiary must be paid to the named beneficiary of the recipient or, if there is no named beneficiary, to the recipient’s estate.

The board shall adopt rules providing for the receipt of retirement benefits in the following optional forms:

Single life.

An actuarially equivalent joint and survivor option, with fifty percent or one hundred percent options.

Actuarially equivalent life with ten-year or twenty-year certain options.

An actuarially equivalent partial lump sum distribution option with a twelve-month maximum lump sum distribution.

An actuarially equivalent graduated benefit option with either a one percent or two percent increase to be applied the first day of January of each year.

The fund may accept rollovers from other eligible plans under rules adopted by the board for the purchase of additional service credit, but only to the extent the transfer is a rollover contribution that meets the requirement of section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code.

The board may accept trustee-to-trustee transfers as permitted by Internal Revenue Code section 403(b)(13) and section 457(e)(17) from an Internal Revenue Code section 403(b) annuity or Internal Revenue Code section 457 deferred compensation plan for the purchase of permissive service credit, as defined in Internal Revenue Code section 415(n)(3)(A) or as repayment of a cashout from a governmental plan under Internal Revenue Code section 415(k)(3).

The board may establish individual retirement accounts and individual retirement annuities as permitted under section 408(q) of the Internal Revenue Code to allow employees to make voluntary employee contributions. The board may adopt rules to implement and administer the accounts and annuities under this section.

Except for supreme and district court judges, unless a member specifically requests that the member receive benefits according to one of these options at the time of applying for retirement, all retirement benefits must be in the form of a single life benefit. For supreme and district court judges, unless a member specifically requests that the member receive benefits according to one of these options at the time of applying for retirement, all retirement benefits must be in the form of a lifetime monthly pension with fifty percent of the benefit continuing for the life of the surviving spouse, if any.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 17; 1977, ch. 499, § 13; 1979, ch. 571, § 2; 1979, ch. 573, § 1; 1979, ch. 574, § 1; 1979, ch. 575, § 1; 1981, ch. 547, § 1; 1981, ch. 548, § 1; 1981, ch. 549, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 550, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 551, § 1; 1983, ch. 572, § 2; 1983, ch. 576, § 3; 1983, ch. 578, § 1; 1983, ch. 579, § 1; 1985, ch. 583, § 1; 1985, ch. 584, § 1; 1985, ch. 585, § 1; 1985, ch. 586, § 1; 1987, ch. 652, §§ 2-5; R.M. disapproved December 5, 1989, S.L. 1991, ch. 740; S.L. 1989, ch. 69, § 61; 1989, ch. 666, §§ 2-4; 1989, ch. 668, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 669, § 1; 1989, ch. 670, § 1; 1991, ch. 626, § 5; 1991, ch. 627, § 3; 1991, ch. 631, § 1; 1993, ch. 532, § 5; 1993, ch. 533, § 2; 1993, ch. 534, §§ 1-3; 1995, ch. 527, § 5; 1995, ch. 531, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 532, § 1; 1997, ch. 51, § 38; 1997, ch. 463, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 478, §§ 2 to 6; 1999, ch. 480, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 494, § 2; 2001, ch. 495, §§ 1, 2, 3; 2003, ch. 497, § 5; 2003, ch. 498, § 8; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 531, § 10; 2005, ch. 533, § 3; 2007, ch. 482, § 7; 2009, ch. 512, §
4; 2009, ch. 514, §§
9, 10; 2011, ch. 431, § 7; 2013, ch. 432, § 4; §
4; §
6; 2015, ch. 49, §§
27, 28, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 372, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 379, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 460, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 461, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 439, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 424, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 259, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 27 and 28 of chapter 49, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 432, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 54-52-17 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 461, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2047; and Section 2 of Chapter 460 Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2049.

Section 54-52-17 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 372, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2053; and Section 4 of Chapter 379, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1148.

Section 54-52-17 was amended 4 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 6 of Chapter 259, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1062; Section 4 of Chapter 424, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2102; Section 28 of Chapter 49, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2015; and Section 27 of Chapter 49, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2015.

Cross-References.

Eligibility for retiree health benefits, see N.D.C.C. § 54-52.1-03.3.

54-52-17.1.
Actuarial studies required.

Before making changes in benefit levels the legislative assembly and the board shall have an actuarial study conducted to determine the total cost of such changes.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 499, § 14.

54-52-17.2.
Multiple plan membership — Eligibility for benefits — Amount of benefits.

For the purpose of determining eligibility for benefits under this chapter, an employee’s years of service credit is the total of the years of service credit earned in the public employees retirement system and the years of service credit earned in any number of the following:

The teachers’ fund for retirement.

The highway patrolmen’s retirement system.

The teachers’ insurance and annuity association of America - college retirement equities fund (TIAA-CREF), for service credit earned while employed by North Dakota institutions of higher education.

Pursuant to rules adopted by the board, an employee who has service credit in the system and in any of the plans described in paragraphs 1 and 2 of subdivision a is entitled to benefits under this chapter. The benefits of a temporary employee employed after July 31, 2015, must be calculated using the benefit formula in section 54-52-17. A permanent employee or a temporary employee employed before August 1, 2015, may elect to have benefits calculated using the benefit formula in section 54-52-17 under either of the following methods:

The final average salary as calculated in section 54-52-17. If the participating member has worked for less than thirty-six months at retirement, the final average salary is the average salary for the total months of employment.

The final average salary as calculated in section 54-52-17 for employment with any of the three eligible employers under this subdivision, with service credit not to exceed one month in any month when combined with the service credit earned in the alternate retirement system.

If an employee who is eligible to participate in the public employees retirement system is also employed in any position when membership in an alternate retirement system is required, then, for purposes of current participation, the employee is a member of each applicable retirement system. The employer shall pay over to each retirement system the member assessment and employer contributions at the rates currently existing for that retirement system.

If an employee described in subdivision a was employed prior to August 1, 2003, and has dual membership rights, the employee may elect to begin participation in the alternate plan pursuant to the plan provisions on August 1, 2003, or may continue participation according to the plan provisions in effect on July 31, 2003. An employee’s election under this subdivision is ineffective unless delivered to the public employees retirement system administrative offices by five p.m. on October 31, 2003. If an election is not received by the public employees retirement system, the participation and benefit calculation requirements in effect on July 31, 2003, apply to that employee.

Service credit may not exceed twelve months of credit per year.

The board shall calculate benefits for an employee under this subsection by using only those years of service credit earned under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 222, § 5; 1987, ch. 223, § 3; R.M. disapproved December 5, 1989, S.L. 1991, ch. 740; S.L. 1989, ch. 671, § 1; 2003, ch. 498, § 9; 2015, ch. 259, § 7, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 259, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

54-52-17.3.
Purchase of legislative service credit.

A member may purchase service credit for the time during each legislative session spent serving as a member of the legislative assembly while holding eligible employment under this chapter. The member shall pay for this service credit an amount equal to the required member assessments and employer contributions plus interest as established by the board. Service credit for legislative sessions prior to July 1, 1985, must be purchased before January 1, 1986. Service credit for each later legislative session must be purchased within one year after the adjournment of that legislative session.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 587, § 6; R.M. disapproved December 5, 1989, S.L. 1991, ch. 740.

54-52-17.4.
Purchase of additional credit.

A participating member may elect to purchase credit for years of service and prior service for which the participating member is not presently receiving credit. A participating member is entitled to purchase additional credit under this section for the following service or prior service, except this service is not eligible for credit if the years claimed also qualify for retirement benefits from another retirement system:

Active prior employment in the armed forces of the United States, except as provided in section 54-52-17.14, for up to four years of credit.

Employment as a permanent employee by a public employer either within or outside the state of North Dakota.

Employment as a permanent employee by a political subdivision participating in the public employees retirement system which did not pay the cost of past service benefits under section 54-52-02.1.

Service the participating member did not elect to repurchase upon re-employment under section 54-52-02.6.

Service of an eligible employee, who exercised the privilege to withdraw from the predecessor plan to the public employees retirement system under subsection 10 of section 54-52-17 as created by section 13 of chapter 499 of the 1977 Session Laws.

Employment as a permanent employee by the federal government.

A participating member may elect to purchase credit for the following absences for which the participating member is not receiving service credit:

Employer-approved leave of absence; or

Months away from work while participating as a seasonal employee.

Supreme and district court judges under the public employees retirement system may elect to purchase credit for the following years of service:

Except as provided in section 54-52-17.14, for up to four years of credit for active employment in the armed forces of the United States.

As a county judge in a county or counties that did not participate in the public employees retirement system under this chapter.

Participation in the public employees retirement system as a county judge may be converted to credit in the judges’ retirement system.

The participating member may purchase credit under this section, or the participating member’s employer may purchase for the participating member, by paying to the board an amount equal to the actuarial cost to the fund of providing the credit. If the participating member purchases credit pursuant to subdivision d of subsection 1, the participating member must pay to the board an amount equal to the greater of the actuarial cost to the fund of providing the credit, or the amount the participating member received upon taking a refund of the participating member’s account balance, plus interest at the actuarial rate of return from the time the participating member was issued the refund. If the participating member is not repurchasing all of the credit originally refunded, the participating member must pay a pro rata amount of the refunded amount determined by dividing the refunded amount by the number of months of credit refunded, multiplying that amount times the number of months of credit the participating member seeks to repurchase, and adding interest at the actuarial rate of return. The participating member or the participating member’s employer shall also pay to the retiree health benefits fund established under section 54-52.1-03.2 an amount equal to the actuarial cost to that fund for the additional credit. This contribution must be recorded as a member contribution pursuant to section 54-52.1-03.2. The board shall adopt rules governing the purchase of additional credit under this section.

Pursuant to rules adopted by the board, the board may allow a participating member to purchase service credit with either pretax or aftertax moneys, at the board’s discretion. If the participating member elects to purchase service credit using pretax moneys, the requirements and restrictions in subsection 3 of section 54-52-05 apply to the purchase arrangement.

In addition to service credit identified in this section, a vested participating member may purchase up to five years of service credit unrelated to any other eligible service.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 672, § 1; 1991, ch. 630, § 5; 1991, ch. 633, § 1; 1993, ch. 532, § 6; 1995, ch. 54, § 42; 1995, ch. 527, § 6; 1997, ch. 464, § 3; 2001, ch. 494, §§ 3, 4; 2003, ch. 34, § 17; 2003, ch. 498, §§ 10, 11; 2005, ch. 531, § 11; 2007, ch. 482, § 8.

54-52-17.5.
Postretirement adjustments.

An individual or the individual’s beneficiary who, on July 31, 2001, is receiving retirement benefits under subdivision a, c, d, or e of subsection 4 of section 54-52-17 is entitled to receive an increase in benefits equal to six percent of the individual’s present benefits with the increase payable beginning August 1, 2001.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 668, § 3; 1997, ch. 463, § 3; 1999, ch. 478, § 7; 2001, ch. 494, § 5.

54-52-17.6.
Benefit payments to alternate payee under qualified domestic relations order.

The board shall pay retirement benefits in accordance with the applicable requirements of any qualified domestic relations order. The board shall review a domestic relations order submitted to it to determine if the domestic relations order is qualified under this section and under rules established by the board for determining the qualified status of domestic relations orders and administering distributions under the qualified orders. Upon determination that a domestic relations order is qualified, the board shall notify the participating member and the named alternate payee of its receipt of the qualified domestic relations order.

A “qualified domestic relations order” for purposes of this section means any judgment, decree, or order, including approval of a property settlement agreement, which relates to the provision of child support, spousal support, or marital property rights to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participating member, is made pursuant to a North Dakota domestic relations law, and which creates or recognizes the existence of an alternate payee’s right to, or assigns to an alternate payee the right to, receive all or a part of the benefits payable to the participating member. A qualified domestic relations order may not require the board to provide any type or form of benefit, or any option, not otherwise provided under the public employees retirement system, or to provide increased benefits as determined on the basis of actuarial value. However, a qualified domestic relations order may require the payment of benefits at the early retirement date notwithstanding that the participating member has not terminated eligible employment. A qualified domestic relations order must specify:

The name and the last-known mailing address of the participating member and the name and mailing address of each alternate payee covered by the order;

The amount or percentage of the participating member’s benefits to be paid by the plan to each alternate payee;

The number of payments or period to which the order applies; and

Each retirement plan to which the order applies.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 392, § 4.

Cross-References.

Inapplicability of certain exemptions from process, etc., see N.D.C.C. §§ 28-22-03.1, 28-22-19.

54-52-17.7.
Employment records.

The years of service and prior service credit for each member as indicated in the records of the public employees retirement system as of July 1, 1991, are deemed correct and recognized as creditable years of service and prior service credit for purposes of calculating retirement benefits under this chapter and may not be reduced. However, the records may be corrected to reflect additional months of creditable service and prior service credit upon proper verification.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 630, § 6.

54-52-17.8.
Benefit limitations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 498, § 22.

54-52-17.9.
Prior service retiree adjustment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 494, § 10.

54-52-17.10.
Prior service retiree adjustment.

Prior service retirees who are receiving benefits under this chapter on July 31, 2001, are entitled to receive an increase in benefits equal to six percent of the individual’s present benefit, with the increased benefits payable beginning August 1, 2001. A prior service retiree is a former participating employee who receives a supplemental monthly payment from the retirement system based upon the original prior service credit system.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 534, § 5; 1997, ch. 463, § 4; 1999, ch. 478, § 8; 2001, ch. 494, § 6.

54-52-17.11.
Judges postretirement adjustments.

A supreme or district court judge or that person’s beneficiary who, on December 31, 2007, is receiving retirement benefits under subdivision b of subsection 4 of section 54-52-17, is entitled to receive an increase in benefits equal to two percent of the individual’s present benefits with the increase payable beginning January 1, 2008. A supreme or district court judge or that person’s beneficiary who, on December 31, 2008, is receiving retirement benefits under subdivision b of subsection 4 of section 54-52-17, is entitled to receive an increase in benefits equal to two percent of the individual’s present benefits with the increase payable beginning January 1, 2009. The increases allowed by this section may only be given if the public employees retirement board determines there is actuarial margin sufficient to pay the increases.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 465, § 1; 2001, ch. 495, § 4; 2007, ch. 484, § 2.

54-52-17.12.
Judges postretirement adjustments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 495, § 5.

54-52-17.13.
Supplemental retiree benefit payment.

If the board determines that the fund has obtained a total return on investments of nine and six hundredths percent or higher for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, or June 30, 2008, the board shall authorize an additional payment equal to seventy-five percent of the January retirement allowance following the fiscal yearend to each eligible retiree in pay status as of that January, excluding judicial retirees and beneficiaries, but including joint and survivor and term certain beneficiaries, under this chapter. The board may only make one payment to each retiree under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 533, § 4; 2007, ch. 484, § 3.

54-52-17.14.
Military service under the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act — Member retirement credit.

A member re-employed under the Uniformed Services Employment and Re-employment Rights Act of 1994, as amended [Pub. L. 103-353; 108 Stat. 3150; 38 U.S.C. 4301-4333], is entitled to receive retirement credit for the period of qualified military service. The required contribution for the credit, including payment for retiree health benefits, must be made in the same manner and by the same party as would have been made had the employee been continuously employed. If the salary the member would have received during the period of service is not reasonably certain, the member’s average rate of compensation during the twelve-month period immediately preceding the member’s period of service or, if shorter, the period of employment immediately preceding that period, times the number of months of credit being purchased must be used. Employees must be allowed up to three times the period of military service or five years, whichever is less, to make any required payments. This provision applies to all qualifying periods of military service since October 1, 1994. Effective for years after December 31, 2008, compensation for purposes of Internal Revenue Code section 415 [26 U.S.C. 415], as amended, includes military differential wage payments, as defined in Internal Revenue Code section 3401(h) [26 U.S.C. 3401(h)], as amended. Any payments made by the member to receive qualifying credit inconsistent with this provision must be refunded. Employees shall make application to the employer for credit and provide a DD Form 214 to verify service. If a participating member dies after December 31, 2006, while performing qualified military service, as defined in section 414(u)(5) [26 U.S.C. 414(u)(5)] of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, the deceased member’s beneficiaries are entitled to any death benefits, other than credit for years of service for purposes of benefits, that would have been provided under the plan if the participating member had resumed employment and then terminated employment on account of death. The period of such member’s qualified military service is treated as vesting service under the plan.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 531, § 12; 2015, ch. 259, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 8 of chapter 259, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 16 of chapter 259, S.L. 2015 provides, “

RETROACTIVE APPLICATION

. Sections 2, 8, (which amended this section) and 14 are retroactive in application.

54-52-18.
Apportionment of benefits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 499, § 17.

54-52-19.
Prior service. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 499, § 17.